Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-858
Interstate county bridges; permit previously acquired; validation.

If any such county prior to May 21, 1935, has acquired, purchased, or received an assignment by gift or otherwise, a permit issued and granted by the United States Government or any corporation or agency created, designated, or established by the United States Government to construct any highway, wagon, vehicle or automobile bridge within the State of Nebraska, and any adjoining state, across any river, navigable or nonnavigable stream, forming a boundary line between any county within the State of Nebraska and any other state of the United States, if in every other way regular in form, same shall be and hereby is declared legal and binding on the county, and of the same force and effect as if such permit had been theretofore directly granted by the United States Government to such county upon its application.

Laws 1935, c. 87, § 4, p. 280;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2104;

R.S.1943, § 39-858.